Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8709
Provider, defined.

Provider means a person that is either:

(1) A facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act; or

(2) A health care professional licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1307.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.